Illinois, session 104th, HB559.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The State Vehicle Identification Act is amended 5by changing Section 0.01 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 610/0.01)  (from Ch. 127, par. 133e)7    Sec. 0.01. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8State Vehicle Identification Act.9(Source: P.A. 86-1324.)